Utah statutes.
10-8-36.   Flagmen -- Grade crossings -- Drains along tracks.
They may require railroad companies to keep flagmen at railroad crossings of
streets, or otherwise provide protection against injury to persons or
property; may compel railroad and street railroad companies to raise or lower
their tracks to conform to any grade which at any time may be established by
the city, so that such tracks may be crossed at any place on any street, alley
or highway; may compel railway companies to make and keep open, and keep in
repair, ditches, drains, sewers and culverts along and under their tracks, so
that the natural or artificial drainage of adjacent property shall not be
impaired.
